Rhode Island, session 2025, SB58.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-18-30 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-18 entitled "Residential
Landlord and Tenant Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-18-30. Self-help for limited repairs.
(a) If the landlord fails to comply with § 34-18-22(a)(1), (2), (4), (5), or (6), and the
reasonable cost of compliance is less than five hundred dollars ($500) in the aggregate per year,
the tenant may cause repairs to be done in a skilled manner, in compliance with applicable state
and local codes, and deduct from the tenant’s rent the actual and reasonable cost or the fair and
reasonable value of the repairs if:
(1) The tenant notifies the landlord of the tenant’s intention to correct the condition at the
landlord’s expense; and
(2) The landlord fails to comply within twenty (20) days, or fails to demonstrate ongoing,
good faith efforts to comply, after being notified by the tenant in writing; or, in the case of
emergency, the landlord either cannot be reached by the tenant, or the landlord fails to comply as
promptly as conditions require; and
(3) The tenant submits an itemized statement to the landlord of the cost or the fair and
reasonable value of the repairs made.
(b) A tenant may not repair at the landlord’s expense if the condition was caused by the
deliberate or negligent act or omission of the tenant, a member of the tenant’s family, or other
person on the premises with the tenant’s consent.

(c) A tenant may, at tenant’s expense, implement energy conservation measures in any
dwelling or dwelling unit to include, but not limited to, removable weather-stripping around doors
and windows, removable interior storm windows, or insulation wrap around hot water heating
tanks. This section shall not apply to any group living unit, hotel unit or rooming unit.
(d) Subsection (c) of this section shall not be construed to authorize the tenant to make
structural changes to a building or otherwise restrict the availability to the tenant of other legal
remedies.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000199
========
LC000199 - Page 2 of 3